Wisconsin, session 2025, SB712.
do enact as follows:SB712,13Section 1. 302.073 of the statutes is created to read:SB712,2,44302.073 Outdoor access by inmates of state correctional institutions, 1county jails, or county houses of correction. (1) (a) Except as provided in par. 2(b), the warden or superintendent of a state correctional institution shall ensure 3that each inmate is permitted to access the outdoors for 3 hours per week unless the 4inmate is subject to a prison lockdown or is being held in solitary confinement.SB712,2,75(b) The requirement under par. (a) does not apply to inmates being held in the 6state correctional institution under s. 302.01 (1) (i) until their 91st day of holding in 7that state correctional institution.SB712,2,128(2) The county sheriff shall ensure that each inmate in a county jail or county 9house of correction, beginning on the inmate’s 31st day of holding in that county jail 10or county house of correction, is permitted to access the outdoors for 3 hours per 11week unless the inmate is subject to a jail lockdown or is being held in solitary 12confinement.SB712,213Section 2. Initial applicability.SB712,2,1614(1) Milwaukee secure detention facility. The treatment of s. 302.073 (1) 15first applies to the state correctional institution under s. 302.01 (1) (i) on January 1, 162028.SB712,2,1717